Arkansas, session 2025, HB1920.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) This act serves to create a pilot program to provide funding
for food services to benefit the elderly population in the State of Arkansas;
and
(2) The pilot program created by this act shall be in place for
the fiscal years of 2025 — 2026 and 2026 — 2027, whereafter the Legislative
Council shall, after reviewing reports on the program submitted by each area
agency on aging in accordance with the provisions of this act, make a
recommendation as to whether the program shall continue.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Funding.
(a) After the distributions under § 19-5-406(a) and (b), an amount not
*LJH266*
03/31/2025 1:08:17 PM LJH266

HB1920
to exceed seven million dollars ($7,000,000), or so much as is available,
shall be transferred to the Aging and Adult Services Fund Account to be used
exclusively for meal and food services benefitting the elderly, including
without limitation congregate meals at senior citizen centers and home-
delivered meal programs.
(b) An amount not to exceed four hundred ninety thousand dollars
($490,000), or seven percent (7%) of funds available to be transferred under
subsection (a) of this section, shall be set aside for the Fight Senior
Hunger Community Grant Match Program.
(c) The remaining ninety-three percent (93%) of funds available to be
transferred under subsection (a) of this section shall be allocated following
the intrastate funding formula and with the following restrictions:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) shall be used for raw food costs in
accordance with the Nutrition Services Incentive Program, 45 C.F.R. §
1321.87(d)(3), as it existed on January 1, 2025; and
(2)(A) Fifty percent (50%) shall be used for the direct
operating and labor costs of preparing and delivering meals or food for the
elderly.
(B) Indirect food preparation and delivery costs shall not
exceed ten percent (10%).

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Fight Senior Hunger Community Grant Match
Program — Creation — Definitions — Reporting.
(a) There is created a grant program to be known as the "Fight Senior
Hunger Community Grant Match Program" to incentivize Arkansas counties,
cities, and nonprofit organizations to help fight senior hunger in their
respective communities.
(b) The Department of Human Services is authorized to award a grant to
a county, city, or nonprofit organization from funds provided under Section 2
of this act if:
(1) The county, city, or nonprofit organization develops a
written plan for providing meals or food to senior citizens in its community
and submits the written plan to the Area Agency on Aging in its region for
approval; and
(2) The members of the county quorum court, city council, or
nonprofit organization submit proof that, through either donations of money
03/31/2025 1:08:17 PM LJH266

HB1920
or property in kind, citizens of the county or city or persons associated
with the nonprofit organization have pledged or will make available no less
than one-half (1/2) of the cost of the program.
(c)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, upon
the Area Agency on Aging's approval of compliance required by subdivision
(b)(1) of this section, the department may approve a state grant to be used
for the benefit of the county, city, or nonprofit organization program in an
amount that equals up to one-half (1/2) of the estimated program cost.
(2) The state's share of the county, city, or nonprofit
organization program shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).
(d) As used in this section:
(1) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization formed under
26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), as it existed on January 1, 2025; and
(2) "Property in kind" is limited to kitchen and dining space
operational costs that would be associated with the county, city, or
nonprofit organization program.
(e) Each Area Agency on Aging shall report on each active city,
county, or nonprofit organization program in its region and expenditures to
address senior food insecurity under this act to the:
(1) House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, and
Legislative Affairs at least one (1) time each year and during a legislative
session;
(2) Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth at least one
(1) time each year during a legislative interim; and
(3) The Legislative Council at least one (1) time each year.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Effectiveness.
This act shall be effective for fiscal years 2025 — 2026 and 2026 —
2027.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the percentage of Arkansas's
elderly population is increasing; that food insecurity within Arkansas's
elderly population is also increasing; that if unaddressed, this food
insecurity will continue to worsen and lead to needless mental and physical
suffering and increased financial stress; that this act creates the Fight
03/31/2025 1:08:17 PM LJH266

HB1920
Senior Hunger Community Grant Match Program to address the issue of food
insecurity; and that it is necessary that this act become effective on July
1, 2025, to align with the start of the grant program created by this act
with the start of the state's fiscal year and thereby ensure proper funding
and appropriation for the grant program. Therefore, an emergency is declared
to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2025.





























03/31/2025 1:08:17 PM LJH266